Utah statutes.
58-46a-304.   Continuing professional education.

As a condition precedent for license renewal each individual licensed under this chapter as a hearing instrument specialist shall complete qualified continuing professional education related to practice of hearing instrument specialist as established by division rule.



Enacted by Chapter 28, 1994 General Session

